Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-325
Fund; commission; powers and duties.

The commission shall determine the standards and procedures reasonably necessary, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as reasonably required, and enter into such contracts with other agencies or private organizations or entities as may be reasonably necessary to efficiently develop, implement, and operate the fund.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1406;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 203.

Nothing in this section requires the Public Service Commission to engage in rulemaking to interpret federal law in conjunction with the administration of the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund. In re Application No. C-1889, 264 Neb. 167, 647 N.W.2d 45 (2002).